Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.573

Early learning facilities grant and loan program—State matching funds for grants or loans—Participation by nongovernmental private-public partnerships—Monitoring performance.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1314.SL) ***

(1) The department must expend moneys from the early learning facilities revolving account to provide state matching funds for early learning facilities grants or loans to provide classrooms necessary for children to participate in the early childhood education and assistance program and working connections child care.

(2) The department must expend moneys from the early learning facilities development account to provide state matching funds for early learning facilities grants to provide classrooms necessary for children to participate in the early childhood education and assistance program and working connections child care.

(3) Funds expended from the accounts as specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section may fund projects only for:

(a) Eligible organizations identified in RCW 43.31.575; and

(b) School districts.

(4)(a) Beginning August 1, 2017, the department shall:

(i) In consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, implement and administer the early learning facilities grant and loan program for school districts as described in RCW 43.31.579(3) and 43.31.581(1); and

(ii) Contract with one or more nongovernmental private-public partnerships that are certified by the community development financial institutions fund to implement and administer grants and loans funded through the early learning facilities revolving account or for a grant funded through the early learning facilities development account, for eligible organizations. Any nongovernmental private-public partnership that is certified by the community development financial institutions fund that is seeking early learning fund resources must demonstrate an ability to raise funding from private and other public entities for early learning facilities construction projects.

(b) The department may allow the application of an eligible organization for a grant or loan from the early learning facilities revolving account or for a grant from the early learning facilities development account created in RCW 43.31.569 to be considered without the involvement of the nongovernmental private-public partnership that is certified by the community development financial institutions fund if a nongovernmental private-public partnership certified by the community development financial institutions fund is not reasonably available to the location of the proposed facility or if the eligible organization has sufficient ability and capacity to proceed with a project absent the involvement of a nongovernmental private-public partnership that is certified by the community development financial institutions fund.

(5) The department shall monitor performance of the early learning facilities grant and loan program. Any nongovernmental private-public partnership that is certified by the community development financial institutions fund receiving state funds for purposes of chapter 12, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. shall provide annual reports, beginning July 1, 2018, to the department. The reports must include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) A list of projects funded through the early learning facilities grant and loan program for eligible organizations to include:

(i) Name;

(ii) Location;

(iii) Grant or loan amount;

(iv) Private match amount;

(v) Public match amount;

(vi) Number of early learners served; and

(vii) Other elements as required by the department;

(b) A demonstration of sufficient investment of private match funds; and

(c) A description of how the projects met the criteria described in RCW 43.31.581.

[2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 43.31.565.